Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20268-1707
Commodity Exchange Act, defined.

Commodity Exchange Act shall mean the act of Congress known as the Commodity Exchange Act, 7 U.S.C. 1, as amended on January 1, 2026.

Laws 1987, LB 575, § 7;

Laws 1993, LB 283, § 5;

Laws 2011, LB76, § 5;

Laws 2019, LB259, § 7;

Laws 2020, LB909, § 17;

Laws 2021, LB363, § 16;

Laws 2022, LB707, § 24;

Laws 2023, LB92, § 16;

Laws 2024, LB1074, § 50;

Laws 2025, LB251, § 17;

Laws 2026, LB717, § 14.
February 26, 2026